Louisiana, session 2026, SB130.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1276 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1276. Congressional districts
Louisiana shall be divided into six congressional districts, and the
qualified electors of each district shall elect one representative to the United
States House of Representatives. The districts shall be composed as follows:
(1) District 1 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36,
37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63,
64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87,
88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 104, 105, 106, 108,
Page 1 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-350 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 130
115, 116, 117, 118, 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125A, 125B, 126, 127, 128, 129,
130, 131, 132, 133, 134, 136, 138, 171, 172, 173, 174, 175, 176, 177, 178, 179A,
179B, 180, 181, 182, 183, 184, 185A, 185B, 187, 188, 189, 190, 191, 192, 193A,
193B, 194A, 194B, 195, 196, 197A, 197B, 198, 199, 200, 201, 202, 203, 204, 205,
210, 211, 212, 213A, 213B, 213C, 214A, 214B, 215, 216A, 216B, 217, 229, 230,
234, 235, 236, 237, 238A, 238B, 246, 247, 248, 1-G, 3-G, 4-G, 5-G, 8-G, 9-G,
10-G, 11-G, 12-G, 13-G, 1-GI, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H, 8-H, 9-H, 1-K, 2-K,
3-K, 4-K, 5-K, 6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 11-K, 12-K, 13-KA,
13-KB, 14-K, 15-K, 16-K, 17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 21-K, 22-K, 23-K, 24-K, 25-K,
26-K, 27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 30-K, 31-K, 33-K, 34-K, 35-K, 1-L, 1-W, 3-W, 4-W,
5-W, 6-W and 7-W of Jefferson Parish; Lafourche Parish; Precincts 3-9, 3-12,
3-14, 3-15, 3-18, 3-19, 3-20, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8, 4-9, 4-11, 4-14, 4-15, 4-17, 4-17A, 4-18,
4-20, 4-21, 4-22, 4-23, 5-9, 5-10, 5-11, 5-12, 5-13, 5-15, 5-16, 5-17, 5-18, 6-8, 6-9,
7-17, 7-18, 7-32, 7-37A, 7-40, 7-41, 7-42, 9-41, 9-41A, 9-41B, 9-41C, 9-41D, 9-45,
9-45A, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 11-2, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 11-8, 11-9, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4,
12-5, 12-6, 12-7, 12-10, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 13-6, 13-7, 13-8, 13-9, 13-10,
14-1, 14-2, 14-3, 14-4, 14-5, 14-6, 14-7, 14-8, 14-9, 14-10, 14-11, 14-13A, 14-14,
14-15, 14-16, 14-17, 14-18A, 14-19, 14-20, 14-21, 16-1, 17-17, 17-18, 17-18A,
17-19 and 17-20 of Orleans Parish; Plaquemines Parish; St. Bernard Parish and
Precincts 409, 426, 603, 605, 701, 702, 703, 704, 705, 706, 801, 802, 802A, 803,
804, 805, 806, 807, 808, 809, 810, 811, 812, 813, 814, 815, 815A, 816, 817, 818,
901, 902, 903, 903A, 904, 905, 906, 907, 908, 909, 909A, 910, 911, 913, 914, 915,
916, 917, 918, 921, 922, M09, M09A, M10, P01, S01, S02, S03, S04, S05, S06,
S07, S08, S09, S10, S11, S13, S15, S16, S17, S18, S19, S21, S22, S23 and S24 of
St. Tammany Parish.
(2) District 2 is composed of Ascension Parish; Precincts 1-7, 1-8, 1-9,
1-12, 1-33, 1-34, 1-35, 1-37, 1-39, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-44, 1-46, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49,
1-52, 1-53, 1-56, 1-57, 1-59, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66, 1-69, 1-72, 1-73, 1-74, 1-75, 1-76,
1-79, 1-80, 1-89, 1-90, 1-99, 1-102, 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-21,
Page 2 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-350 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 130
2-26, 2-28, 2-33, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-9, 3-10, 3-11, 3-13, 3-14, 3-15,
3-16, 3-17, 3-18, 3-19, 3-20, 3-21, 3-22, 3-23, 3-25, 3-26, 3-27, 3-29, 3-30, 3-31,
3-33, 3-34, 3-35, 3-36, 3-37, 3-38, 3-39, 3-40, 3-41, 3-43, 3-44, 3-45, 3-46, 3-47,
3-48, 3-49, 3-50, 3-51, 3-52, 3-53, 3-55, 3-56, 3-57, 3-58, 3-59, 3-60, 3-61, 3-62,
3-63, 3-64, 3-65, 3-66, 3-67, 3-68, 3-69, 3-70, 3-71, 3-73, 3-74, 3-75 and 3-76 of
East Baton Rouge Parish; Livingston Parish; Precincts 1-6, 2-6, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3,
5-1, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4 and 6-6 of St. Charles Parish; Precincts 1, 2,
4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 22 and 23 of St. James Parish; Precincts 1-4, 1-5, 1-6,
1-7, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-2,
5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3 and 7-4 of St. John the Baptist
Parish; Precincts 101, 102, 103, 104, 105, 106, 106A, 107, 108, 110, 111, 112, 113,
114, 115, 116, 118, 201, 202, 203, 204, 205, 206, 207, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 306,
307, 308, 309, 310, 312, 312A, 313, 314, 401, 402, 403, 404, 405, 406, 407, 408,
410, 411, 412, 413, 414, 415, 416, 417, 418, 419, 420, 421, 422, 427, 429, 430, 501,
502, 503, 504, 505, 602, 604, 606, 609, A01, A02, A02A, A03, A04, C01, C02, C03,
C04, C06, C07, C08, C09, C11, F01, M01, M02, M04, M06, M07, M08, M11,
M12 and MD1 of St. Tammany Parish and Precincts 71, 74, 122A, 122B, 122C,
124, 145, 147, 149, 149A and 151 of Tangipahoa Parish.
(3) District 3 is composed of Acadia Parish; Precincts 167, 260, 261, 262,
300, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 306, 307, 308, 309E, 309W, 310, 311, 312, 313E,
313W, 314, 315E, 315W, 316E, 316W, 317, 318, 319N, 319S, 320E, 320W, 321,
322, 323, 324, 325, 326, 327, 328, 329, 330, 331, 332N, 332S, 333, 334, 335, 336,
337, 338, 339, 340, 360, 361, 362, 363, 364, 365, 366, 367, 368, 369, 370, 371N,
371S, 372, 405, 440, 441, 461, 463, 464, 465, 466E, 466W, 467, 800, 801, 860S,
861E and 861W of Calcasieu Parish; Cameron Parish; Iberia Parish; Jefferson
Davis Parish; Precincts 1, 3, 8, 11, 12, 13, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35,
36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 50, 55, 59, 60, 65, 66, 67, 69, 70,
71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93,
94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 104, 105, 106, 107, 108, 109, 110, 111,
Page 3 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-350 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 130
114, 115, 116, 117, 118, 119, 120, 121, 123, 124, 125, 126, 127, 128, 130, 133, 134,
135 and 136 of Lafayette Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36,
37, 38, 39, 40, 42 and 43 of St. Martin Parish; St. Mary Parish; Terrebonne
Parish and Vermilion Parish.
(4) District 4 is composed of Allen Parish; Precincts 2-5, 3-1, 3-1A, 3-3,
4-1, 4-2, 4-2A, 6-1, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-3A, 9-1, 9-2, 9-2A, 9-3, 9-5, 10-2,
10-2A, 10-3A, 10-3B, 10-4, 11-1 and 11-2 of Avoyelles Parish; Beauregard
Parish; Bienville Parish; Bossier Parish; Caddo Parish; Precincts 160E, 160W,
161, 162E, 162W, 163, 164, 165, 166E, 166W, 400, 401, 402, 403, 404, 406, 407,
408, 460E, 460W, 468, 469, 560, 561, 562, 600, 601, 602, 603, 660, 661, 662, 663,
664, 700, 701, 702, 703, 760, 761, 762 and 860N of Calcasieu Parish; Claiborne
Parish; De Soto Parish; Evangeline Parish; Natchitoches Parish; Red River
Parish; Sabine Parish; Union Parish; Vernon Parish and Webster Parish.
(5) District 5 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 2-2, 2-2A, 2-2C,
2-4, 2-4A, 2-7, 2-8, 5-1A, 6-2 and 6-2A of Avoyelles Parish; Caldwell Parish;
Catahoula Parish; Concordia Parish; East Carroll Parish; East Feliciana
Parish; Franklin Parish; Grant Parish; Jackson Parish; La Salle Parish;
Lincoln Parish; Madison Parish; Morehouse Parish; Ouachita Parish; Pointe
Coupee Parish; Rapides Parish; Richland Parish; St. Helena Parish; Precincts
2, 6, 11, 15, 16, 17, 28, 33, 40A, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45A, 45B, 46, 47, 49, 70, 70A, 72,
72A, 73, 101, 102, 104, 106, 106A, 107, 108, 109, 110, 111A, 112, 114, 115B, 116,
117, 118, 118A, 119, 120, 120A, 120B, 121, 121A, 123, 125, 127, 129A, 133, 133A,
137, 137A, 137B, 137C, 137D, 139, 141, 141A, 143 and 143A of Tangipahoa
Parish; Tensas Parish; Washington Parish; West Carroll Parish; West Feliciana
Parish and Winn Parish.
(6) District 6 is composed of Assumption Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3,
1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-10, 1-11, 1-13, 1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-18, 1-19, 1-20, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23,
1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27, 1-28, 1-29, 1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-36, 1-38, 1-40, 1-45, 1-50,
Page 4 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-350 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 130
1-51, 1-54, 1-55, 1-58, 1-60, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-67, 1-70, 1-71, 1-77, 1-78, 1-81,
1-82, 1-83, 1-84, 1-85, 1-86, 1-87, 1-88, 1-91, 1-92, 1-93, 1-94, 1-95, 1-96, 1-97,
1-98, 1-100, 1-101, 1-104, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14,
2-15, 2-16, 2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-22, 2-23, 2-24, 2-25, 2-27, 2-29, 2-30, 2-31,
2-32, 2-34, 2-35, 2-36, 2-37, 2-38, 3-8, 3-12, 3-24, 3-28, 3-32, 3-42, 3-54 and 3-72
of East Baton Rouge Parish; Iberville Parish; Precincts 150A, 150B, 151, 152,
153, 154, 155, 156, 157A, 170, 225, 226, 227, 228, 231, 232A, 232B, 2-G, 6-G and
7-G of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21,
22, 23, 24, 51, 52, 53, 54, 56, 57, 58, 63, 64, 68, 112, 113 and 122 of Lafayette
Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-5, 1-6, 2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 2-6, 2-7, 3-1, 3-8, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1,
5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 5-7, 5-8, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-6, 6-7, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4, 7-5, 7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9A,
7-10, 7-11, 7-12, 7-13, 7-14, 7-15, 7-16, 7-19, 7-20, 7-21, 7-23, 7-24, 7-25, 7-25A,
7-26, 7-27, 7-27B, 7-28, 7-28A, 7-29, 7-30, 7-33, 7-35, 7-37, 8-1, 8-2, 8-4, 8-6, 8-7,
8-8, 8-9, 8-12, 8-13, 8-14, 8-15, 8-19, 8-20, 8-21, 8-22, 8-23, 8-24, 8-25, 8-26, 8-27,
8-28, 8-30, 9-1, 9-3, 9-4, 9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 9-14, 9-15,
9-16, 9-17, 9-19, 9-21, 9-23, 9-25, 9-26, 9-28, 9-28C, 9-29, 9-30, 9-30A, 9-31,
9-31A, 9-31B, 9-31D, 9-32, 9-33, 9-34A, 9-35, 9-35A, 9-36, 9-36B, 9-37, 9-38,
9-38A, 9-39, 9-39B, 9-40, 9-40A, 9-40C, 9-42, 9-42C, 9-43A, 9-43B, 9-43C, 9-43E,
9-43F, 9-43G, 9-43H, 9-43I, 9-43J, 9-43K, 9-43L, 9-43M, 9-43N, 9-44, 9-44A,
9-44B, 9-44D, 9-44E, 9-44F, 9-44G, 9-44I, 9-44J, 9-44L, 9-44M, 9-44N, 9-44O,
9-44P, 9-44Q, 10-3, 10-6, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 11-10, 11-11, 11-12, 11-13,
11-14, 11-17, 12-9, 12-11, 12-12, 12-13, 12-14, 12-16, 12-17, 12-19, 13-11, 13-12,
13-13, 13-14, 13-15, 13-16, 14-12, 14-23, 14-24A, 14-25, 14-26, 15-1, 15-2, 15-3,
15-5, 15-6, 15-8, 15-9, 15-10, 15-11, 15-12, 15-12A, 15-13, 15-13A, 15-13B, 15-14,
15-14A, 15-14B, 15-14C, 15-14D, 15-14E, 15-14F, 15-14G, 15-15, 15-15A,
15-15B, 15-16, 15-17, 15-17A, 15-17B, 15-18, 15-18A, 15-18B, 15-18C, 15-18D,
15-18E, 15-18F, 15-19, 15-19A, 15-19B, 15-19C, 16-1A, 16-2, 16-3, 16-4, 16-5,
16-6, 16-7, 16-8, 16-9, 17-1, 17-2, 17-3, 17-4, 17-5, 17-6, 17-7, 17-8, 17-9, 17-10,
17-11, 17-12, 17-13, 17-13A, 17-14, 17-15 and 17-16 of Orleans Parish; Precincts
Page 5 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-350 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 130
1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 2-1, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4
and 7-5 of St. Charles Parish; Precincts 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18 and 19 of St. James
Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2 and 1-3 of St. John the Baptist Parish; St. Landry
Parish; Precincts 41 of St. Martin Parish and West Baton Rouge Parish.
Section 2. R.S. 18:1276.1 is hereby repealed.
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (1-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the state of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana Senate and the Louisiana House of
Representatives to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the
Legislature of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
18:532 and 532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall not reduce the term of office of any person
holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which the appointment
or election is based upon a congressional district as composed pursuant to R.S. 18:1276.1.
Any position or office that is filled by appointment or election based upon a congressional
district and that is to be filled after January 3, 2029, shall be appointed or elected from a
district as it is described in Section 1 of this Act.
Page 6 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-350 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 130
Section 5.(A) Solely for the purposes of qualifying for election and the conduct of
the election of representatives to the United States Congress at the regularly scheduled
election for representatives to the congress in 2028, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act
shall become effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the
governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the
governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act
is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of
Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval for the
purposes established in this Subsection.
(B) For subsequent elections of representatives to the United States Congress and for
all other purposes, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective at noon on
January 3, 2029.
(C) The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective at noon on January
3, 2029.
(D) The provisions of this Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and
Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.